Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5890.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47-33 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-33. Possession of firearms by minors.
(a) It shall be unlawful within this state for any person under eighteen (18) years of age to
possess and use any firearm unless the person is in the presence of a parent or guardian or
supervising adult at any regular and recognized camp or rifle range approved by the Rhode Island
state police or by the chief of police of the city or town in which the camp or rifle range is located;
provided, that this provision shall not apply to minors engaged in lawful hunting activity under the
supervision of a parent or guardian or qualified adult, minors participating in Reserve Officer
Training Corps programs, ceremonial parade activities, competitive and target shooting,
participants in state militia activities and minors participating in a basic firearms education
program; provided, further, that a person under eighteen (18) years of age may carry a firearm,
unloaded, in a suitable case to and from his or her home and the camp or range and from the camp
or range to other camp or range when accompanied by a parent, guardian, or supervising adult.
(b) For purposes of this section only, “qualified adult” means any person twenty-one (21)
years of age or older and permitted by law to possess and use the firearm.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002193
========
LC002193 - Page 2 of 3